Washington statutes.
RCW 19.28.291

Violations of chapter—Issuance of subpoenas—Application.

(1) If he or she has reason to believe there has been a violation of this chapter, the director and the director's authorized representatives may issue subpoenas to enforce the production and examination of any information, whether written or electronic, necessary to enforce this chapter. The subpoena must describe the possible violation, cite the relevant sections of this chapter and rules adopted under this chapter, and must explain how the information being subpoenaed is reasonably related to the possible violation.

(2) The subpoena may be issued only if an electrical contractor, administrator, electrician, or other entity or person to which this chapter applies fails to provide the above information when requested by the department. The department's request for information must describe the possible violation, cite the relevant sections of this chapter and rules adopted under this chapter, and must explain how the information being requested is reasonably related to the possible violation.

(3) The superior court has the power to enforce such a subpoena by proper proceedings.

(4) This section applies to all electrical contractors, administrators, electricians, other entities and persons, and electrical work to which this chapter applies.

[ 2010 c 55 s 1.]